Washington statutes.
RCW 15.17.050

Rules—Authority of director.

(1) The director shall adopt rules providing standards for apples, apricots, Italian prunes, peaches, sweet cherries, pears, potatoes, and asparagus and may adopt rules providing standards for any other fruit or vegetable. When establishing these standards, the director shall consider the factors of maturity, soundness, color, shape, size, and freedom from mechanical and plant pest injury and other factors important to marketing.

(2) The director shall adopt rules providing for mandatory inspection of apples, apricots, Italian prunes, peaches, sweet cherries, pears, and asparagus and may adopt rules providing for mandatory inspection of any other fruit or vegetable.

(3) The director may adopt rules:

(a) Fixing the sizes and dimensions of containers to be used for the packing or handling of any fruits or vegetables; and

(b) Establishing combination grades for fruits and vegetables. The standards for combination grades shall, by percentage quantities, include two or more of the grades provided for under this chapter.

[ 1998 c 154 s 4; (2004 c 211 s 1 expired December 31, 2009); 1963 c 122 s 5.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2004 c 211 s 1: "Section 1 of this act expires December 31, 2009." [ 2007 c 237 s 1; 2005 c 234 s 1; 2004 c 211 s 2.]

Effective date—2004 c 211: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 29, 2004]." [ 2004 c 211 s 3.]